Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-407 Duplication of benefits;
adjustment. If and when a program of hospital, surgical, and medical
benefits is enacted by the federal government or by the State, the extended
health insurance benefits provided by policies issued under this section shall
be adjusted to avoid any duplication of benefits offered by the federal or
state programs. The premium rates applicable thereto shall be adjusted to
conform with the adjusted benefits. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next